Hawaii statutes.
[§659-3] Forfeiture of franchise. The
several circuit courts shall have jurisdiction of all proceedings in, or in the
nature of, quo warranto, brought by or in the name of the public utilities
commission, or the State, for the forfeiture of the franchise of any corporate
body offending against any law relating to such corporation, for misuser, for
nonuser, for doing or committing any act or acts amounting to a surrender of
its charter and for exercising rights not conferred upon it. [L 1972, c 90,
§3(c); HRS §659-47.5; ren HRS §659-3]

Attorney General Opinions

Quo warranto action may be brought to enforce "resign to
run" law. Att. Gen. Op. 86-4.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next